Utah statutes.
41-1a-501.   Certificate of title required.

Unless exempted, each owner of a motor vehicle, vessel, outboard motor, trailer, semitrailer, manufactured home, mobile home, or off-highway vehicle shall apply to the division for a certificate of title on forms furnished by the division as evidence of ownership.

